Arkansas, session 2025, HB1433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code 9-15-208 is amended to read as follows:
9-15-208. Law enforcement assistance.
(a) When an order of protection is issued under this chapter, upon
request of the petitioner the circuit court may order a law enforcement
officer with jurisdiction to accompany the petitioner and assist in placing
the petitioner in possession of the dwelling or residence or to otherwise
assist in execution or service of the order of protection.
(b) The court may also order a law enforcement officer to assist the
petitioner in returning to the residence and getting personal effects.
(c) If law enforcement is assisting in the execution or service of an
*LJH136*
04-07-2025 10:17:28 LJH136

As Engrossed: H2/12/25 H2/18/25 H4/7/25 HB1433
order of protection under § 9-15-202 or § 9-15-204, law enforcement shall
perform a check for active warrants for the arrest of the person being served
before executing service under subdivision (a) of this section.

/s/K. Moore































04-07-2025 10:17:28 LJH136